test/src/morphology/V-killw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - killõ: # Verb 15 'eng /est külvata/fin' - full paradigm
     killõ+V+Inf: killõ
     killõ+V+Ger: killõs
     killõ+V+Ger: killõs
     killõ+V+Sup: kīlam
     killõ+V+Sup+Ine: kīlamõs
     killõ+V+Sup+Ela: kīlamõst
     killõ+V+Sup+Tra: kīlamõks
     killõ+V+Sup+Abe: kīlamõt
     killõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kīlab
     killõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kīlat
     killõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kīlabõd
     killõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kīliz
     killõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kīlizt, kīliztõ]
     killõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kīlizt, kīliztõ]
     killõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kil
     killõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kīlaks
     killõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kīla
     killõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: killõ
     killõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kīlagid
     killõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kīlag
     killõ+V+QuoSg3: kīlaji
     killõ+V+ActPrfPrc: killõn
     killõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kildõd
